zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 音频和视频分配器和切换器 > Toslink 分路器和切换器: Toslink 分路器; Toslink 切换器
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > AV 分配器/切換器 > Toslink 分配器與切換器: Toslink 分配器; Toslink 切換器
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Audio & Video Splitters & Switches > Toslink Splitters & Switches: Toslink Splitters; Toslink Switches
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Splitter e interruttori audio e video > Splitter e switch Toslink: Splitter Toslink; Switch Toslink
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Lyd og video – fordelere og omskiftere > Toslink-fordelere og -omskiftere: Toslink-fordelere; Toslink-omskiftere
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες ήχου & βίντεο > Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες Toslink: Διαχωριστές Toslink; Διακόπτες Toslink
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Audio i video razdjelnici i sklopke > Razdjelnici i prekidači za Toslink: Razdjelnici za Toslink; Prekidači za Toslink
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Rozbočovače a prepínače zvuku a videa > Toslink rozdeľovače a prepínače: Toslink rozdeľovače; Toslink prepínače
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Splitters e interrutores de áudio e vídeo > Divisores e comutadores toslink: Divisores toslink; Comutadores toslink
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Bộ chia và công tắc âm thanh và hình ảnh > Bộ tách và công tắc Toslink: Bộ tách Toslink; Công tắc Toslink
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Аудио- и видеосплитери и превключватели > Toslink сплитери и превключватели: Toslink сплитери; Toslink превключватели
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Divisores e comutadores de áudio e vídeo > Divisores e chaves Toslink: Divisores Toslink; Chaves Toslink
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Audio- és videoelosztók és -kapcsolók > Toslink-elosztók és -kapcsolók: Toslink-elosztók; Toslink-kapcsolók
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > สวิตช์และตลับแยก AV > ตัวแยกและสวิตช์ Toslink: ตัวแยกสัญญาณ Toslink; สวิตช์ Toslink
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Splittere și comutatoare audio și video > Splittere și switch-uri Toslink: Splittere Toslink; Switch-uri Toslink
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Répartiteurs et commutateurs audio et vidéo > Répartiteurs et commutateurs Toslink: Répartiteurs Toslink; Commutateurs Toslink
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Avdio in video razdelilniki in preklopniki > Toslink razdelilniki in preklopniki: Toslink razdelilniki; Toslink preklopniki
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > AVスプリッター・スイッチ > Toslinkスプリッター・スイッチャー: Toslinkスプリッター; Toslinkスイッチャー
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Divisores y conmutadores de audio y vídeo > Divisores y conmutadores Toslink: Divisores Toslink; Conmutadores Toslink
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > AV-jakajat ja -kytkimet > Toslink-jakajat ja -kytkimet: Toslink-jakajat; Toslink-kytkimet
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Разветвители и коммутаторы аудио- и видеосигналов > Разветвители и переключатели Toslink: Разветвители Toslink; Переключатели Toslink
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Audio-/videosplitters en -schakelaars > Toslink splitters en switches: Toslink splitters; Toslink switches
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > AV rozbočovače a přepínače > Toslink rozbočovače a přepínače: Toslink rozbočovače; Toslink přepínače
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Audio- und Video-Splitter & -Switches > Toslink-Splitter und -Switches: Toslink-Splitter; Toslink-Switches
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Garso ir vaizdo skirstytuvai ir jungikliai > Toslink skirstytuvai ir jungikliai: Toslink skirstytuvai; Toslink jungikliai
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Rozdzielacze i przełączniki do przesyłania obrazu i dźwięku > Rozdzielacze i przełączniki Toslink: Rozdzielacze Toslink; Przełączniki Toslink
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 오디오 및 비디오 스플리터/스위치 > Toslink 스플리터 및 스위치: Toslink 스플리터; Toslink 스위치
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Kabeldelare och omkopplare för video och ljud > Toslink-fördelare och omkopplare: Toslink-fördelare; Toslink-omkopplare
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Ses ve Görüntü Ayırıcıları ve Anahtarları > Toslink Bölücüler ve Anahtarlar: Toslink Bölücüler; Toslink Anahtarlar
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Lyd- og videosplittere og -brytere > Toslink-splittere og -brytere: Toslink-splittere; Toslink-brytere